Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3305
Assessment of fees; restrictions;
calculations.

(1)
A civil litigation funding company may not assess fees for any period exceeding
thirty-six months from the date of the contract with the consumer.

(2) Fees assessed
by the civil litigation funding company shall compound at least semiannually
but shall not compound based on any lesser time period.

(3) In calculating
the annual percentage fee or rate of return, a civil litigation funding company
shall include all charges payable directly or indirectly by the consumer and
shall compute the rate based only on amounts actually received and retained
by a consumer.

Laws 2010, LB1094, § 5.